Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
ARTICLE 30 CREDIT UNIONS - GENERAL PROVISIONS
11-30-109. Directors and officers - compensation.

At its first meeting after the annual election, the board of directors shall elect from its own number an executive officer, who may be designated as chair of the board or president; a vice-chair of the board or one or more vice-presidents; a treasurer; and a secretary. The offices of secretary and treasurer may be combined into one office known as secretary-treasurer. The persons so elected shall be the executive officers of the corporation. The board of directors shall be responsible for the general management of the affairs of the credit union, and more specifically to:

Act on applications for membership, or to appoint from among the membership of the credit union, one or more membership officers who may act on applications for membership;

Set policies, terms, and conditions under which loans will be available to members, determine interest rates on loans and on deposits, determine whether an interest refund shall be made to members, and declare the rates of any such interest refund and the classes of loans to which such refund shall apply. Any such refund shall be paid from interest income of the credit union and shall be paid only to members who paid interest to the credit union during the period and who were members of record of the credit union at the close of such period, but no refund shall be paid to a member whose loan is delinquent more than the period of time specified by the board of directors.

Fix the amount of the blanket surety bond which shall cover all elected and appointed officials and all employees of the credit union. Such blanket surety bond shall be in an amount equal to the assets of the credit union as of December 31 of the previous year or one million dollars, whichever is less, or in such other amount as may be prescribed by the commissioner.

Declare dividends and, subject to approval by the commissioner, adopt amendments to the bylaws of the credit union;

Determine when any vacancy exists in the board of directors or in the credit committee, and to fill vacancies in the board and in the credit committee until successors are elected or appointed and qualify, and to appoint one or more assistant secretaries or treasurers or both, as needed; and the board may employ an officer in charge of operations whose title shall be either president or general manager, or, in lieu thereof, the board of directors may designate the treasurer or an assistant treasurer to act as general manager and be in active charge of the affairs of the credit union;

Determine the maximum individual share holdings in the credit union and the maximum amount of individual loans which can be made either with or without security;

Have charge of and supervise investments of credit union funds;

Maintain records pursuant to rules promulgated by the financial services board concerning how long records should be retained and in what manner;

Provide for compensation of necessary clerical and auditing assistance requested by the supervisory committee and of loan officers appointed by the credit committee, and to establish any salary which shall be paid to the treasurer or general manager.

The duties of the officers shall be as determined in the bylaws; except that the treasurer shall be the general manager if none has been employed pursuant to paragraph (e) of subsection (1) of this section.

A credit union may reasonably compensate a director for his or her services to the credit union. Providing reasonable life, health, accident, and similar insurance protection is not considered compensation. Directors, officers, and committee members may be reimbursed for necessary expenses incidental to the performance of the official business of the credit union.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 300, § 9.

CSA:

C. 47, § 9.

L. 41:

p. 374, § 9.

L. 51:

p. 315, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 38-1-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 38-1-9.

L. 67:

p. 318, § 8.

L. 77:

IP(1) and (1)(e) amended, p. 567, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(1)(b) amended, p. 612, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 83:

(1)(b) amended, p. 484, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 84:

IP(1), (1)(b), (1)(c), (1)(g), and (2) amended and (3) added, p. 374, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 90:

(1)(c) amended, p. 1838, § 9, effective May 31.

L. 94:

IP(1) and (1)(b) amended, p. 65, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(1)(h) amended, p. 130, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

(3) amended, (SB 16-125), ch. 99, p. 287, § 2, effective August 10.

11-30-110. Credit committee - credit officer.

The credit committee or credit officer shall have the general supervision of all loans to members. Applications for loans shall be on a form approved by the credit committee or the credit officer. At least a majority of the members of the credit committee or the credit officer shall pass and approve or disapprove all loans; except that the credit committee or the credit officer may appoint one or more loan officers and delegate to the same the power to approve or disapprove loans which are within limits prescribed by the credit committee or the credit officer. Each loan officer shall furnish to the credit committee or the credit officer a record of each loan application received by him within seven days after the date of filing of the application. All loans not approved by a loan officer may be considered by the credit committee or the credit officer. No member of the credit committee shall receive any compensation as a loan officer or be employed by the credit union in any other capacity. A credit officer may receive compensation in connection with the performance of his duties. The credit committee shall meet as often as may be necessary after due notice to each member. Vacancies in the credit committee shall be filled pursuant to section 11-30-109 (1)(e).

Source:

L. 31:

p. 301, § 10.

CSA:

C. 47, § 10.

L. 41:

p. 375, § 10.

CRS 53:

§ 38-1-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 38-1-10.

L. 67:

p. 319, § 9.

L. 75:

Entire section amended, p. 394, § 2, effective June 16.

L. 79:

Entire section amended, p. 416, § 2, effective July 1.

11-30-111. Supervisory committee.

The supervisory committee shall:

Make, or cause to be made, a comprehensive annual audit of the books and affairs of the credit union and shall submit a report of the annual audit to the board of directors and a summary of that report to the members at the next annual meeting. The committee shall make or cause to be made such supplementary audits or examinations as it deems necessary.

Make an annual report and submit the same at the annual meeting of the members;

By unanimous vote of the committee if it deems such action to be necessary for the proper conduct of the credit union, suspend any officer or director of the credit union, or any member of the credit committee, and shall call a special meeting of the members of the credit union not less than seven nor more than fourteen days thereafter to act on such suspension. The members at said meeting may sustain any such suspension and remove any such officer, director, or member of the credit committee permanently and elect a successor thereto for the unexpired term of office or may reinstate any such person.

Biennially verify, or cause to be verified, by a random sampling or by verification of all members' accounts, the members' share, deposit, and loan accounts. Such verification may be obtained by either sending or causing to be sent a statement of account to each member or by such means as may be specified by the commissioner.

By majority vote, the supervisory committee may call a special meeting of the members of the credit union to consider any violation of any provision of this article, the bylaws, or any rule or requirement of the credit union, by any officer, director, member of any committee, or any member, which the committee deems to be detrimental to the credit union. The supervisory committee shall fill vacancies in its own membership until the next annual election of the credit union.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 301, § 11.

CSA:

C. 47, § 11.

L. 41:

p. 375, § 11.

L. 51:

p. 315, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 38-1-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 38-1-11.

L. 67:

p. 319, § 10.

L. 75:

(1)(a) amended, p. 396, § 1, effective June 16.

L. 84:

(1)(a) amended, p. 375, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(1)(d) amended, p. 85, § 2, effective March 23.

L. 2013:

(1)(d) amended, (SB 13-159), ch. 193, p. 791, § 4, effective May 11.

11-30-112. Capital.

The capital of a credit union shall consist of the payments that have been made to it in shares by the several members thereof. The credit union has a lien on the shares and deposits of a member for any sum due to the credit union from said member or for any loan endorsed by him. A credit union may charge an entrance fee and an annual membership fee, but such fees shall be uniform to all members.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 302, § 12.

CSA:

C. 47, § 12.

L. 41:

p. 376, § 12.

CRS 53:

§ 38-1-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 38-1-12.

L. 79:

Entire section amended, p. 417, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 485, § 6, effective July 1.

11-30-113. Minors.

Shares may be issued and deposits received in the name of a minor. A member who is a minor shall be entitled to withdraw or pledge any shares owned by him and to receive from the credit union any and all dividends, or other moneys, at any time the same become due, in the same manner and subject to the same conditions as an adult, and any receipt or acquittance signed by such a minor shall constitute a valid release and discharge to the credit union for the payment of such moneys. The board of directors of the credit union may provide in the bylaws of the credit union a minimum age of any minor to be eligible for membership in the credit union and to vote at any meeting of the members.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 302, § 13.

CSA:

C. 47, § 13.

L. 41:

p. 376, § 13.

CRS 53:

§ 38-1-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 38-1-13.

L. 67:

p. 320, § 11.

11-30-114. Rates. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 31:

p. 302, § 14.

CSA:

C. 47, § 14.

L. 41:

p. 376, § 14.

L. 51:

p. 315, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 38-1-14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 38-1-14.

L. 80:

Entire section amended, p. 469, § 1, effective March 10.

L. 85:

Entire section repealed, p. 398, § 1, effective March 1.

11-30-115. Power to borrow and loan money.

A credit union may borrow from any source a total sum which shall not exceed fifty percent of its shares, deposits, and undivided earnings. No credit union shall loan more than ten percent of its assets to any member or to another credit union.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 303, § 15.

CSA:

C. 47, § 15.

L. 41:

p. 376, § 15.

L. 53:

p. 239, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 38-1-15.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 38-1-15.

L. 67:

p. 320, § 12.

L. 84:

Entire section amended, p. 375, § 7, effective July 1.

11-30-116. Loans.

A credit union may make loans to members subject to the provisions of this article and the bylaws of the credit union. A borrower may repay a loan in whole or in part any day the office of the credit union is open for business. A credit union may make loans to its own directors, credit officers, or members of its own supervisory committee or credit committee, but no such loan or aggregate of loans to any one director, credit officer, or committee member that exceeds twenty thousand dollars plus pledged shares may be made unless approved by the board of directors.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 303, § 16.

CSA:

C. 47, § 16.

L. 41:

p. 376, § 16.

L. 51:

p. 315, § 5.

L. 53:

p. 239, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 38-1-16.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 38-1-16.

L. 67:

p. 320, § 13.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 485, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 84:

Entire section amended, p. 375, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 87:

Entire section amended, p. 464, § 1, effective May 8.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 131, § 6, effective July 1.

11-30-117. Reserves.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 131, § 7, effective July 1, 2004.)

The board may require reserves to protect the interest of members by general rules, including reserve requirements for any privately insured credit union. In addition, the commissioner may require special reserves by an order directed to an individual credit union in any special case.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 303, § 17.

CSA:

C. 47, § 17.

L. 41:

p. 377, § 17.

L. 45:

p. 308, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 38-1-17.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 38-1-17.

L. 67:

p. 321, § 14.

L. 79:

Entire section R&RE, p. 417, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 90:

(2) amended, p. 1838, § 10, effective May 31.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 131, § 7, effective July 1.

11-30-117.5. Share insurance required - confidentiality.

Each credit union shall apply for insurance on its shares and deposits as provided by the national credit union administration board under section 201 of the "Federal Credit Union Act", 12 U.S.C. sec. 1781, or comparable insurance approved by the commissioner. Credit unions with debt and equity capital consisting primarily of funds from other credit unions shall not be subject to the requirements of this section.

Any credit union which is denied a commitment for such insurance shall, within thirty days of such denial, commence steps to liquidate or merge with an insured credit union or shall apply in writing to the commissioner for an extension of time to obtain an insurance commitment. The commissioner shall grant one or more extensions of time to obtain the insurance commitment upon satisfactory evidence that the credit union has made or is making a substantial effort to satisfy the conditions precedent to the issuance of an insurance commitment.

No credit union shall be granted a charter by the commissioner unless such credit union has applied for insurance on its shares and deposits as provided in this section.

Neither the commissioner, the commissioner's deputy, nor any other person appointed by the commissioner shall divulge any information acquired in the discharge of the person's duties; except that:

A person specified in the introductory portion to this subsection (4) may divulge information acquired in the discharge of the person's duties if doing so is made necessary by law or under order of court in an action involving the division or in criminal actions;

Any party entitled to appear in a hearing on an application for a community credit union charter shall have access to the applicant's proposed articles or amended articles of incorporation, application for charter, and proposed bylaws;

The commissioner may furnish information as to the condition of a credit union to the national credit union administration board or its successors, a qualified insuring organization, a liquidating agent appointed by the commissioner, a federal home loan bank, a federal reserve bank, the division of banking, the executive director of the department of regulatory agencies, or a department or division of any other state having supervisory authority over credit unions and may accept any report of examination made on behalf of such board, organization, liquidating agent, bank, department, or division;

The commissioner may give records or information in the commissioner's possession to a licensing agency within the department of regulatory agencies relating to possible misconduct by a person or entity licensed by said agency;

The board, the commissioner, and their respective designees may exchange information obtained by the division as to possible criminal violations of any law relating to the activities of a credit union with the appropriate law enforcement agencies; and

Notwithstanding any provision of this article to the contrary, the commissioner may disclose any information in the records of the division or acquired by the commissioner in the discharge of the commissioner's duties that is available from the national credit union administration board or its successors, or the disclosure of which has been specifically authorized by the board of directors of the credit union to which such information relates. Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize the board of directors of a credit union to waive any privileges that belong solely to the financial services board, the division, or its employees.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire section added, p. 616, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 89:

(4) amended, p. 611, § 4, effective April 19.

L. 93:

(4) amended, p. 1446, § 7, effective June 6.

L. 94:

(1) and (3) amended, p. 65, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(4) amended, p. 1009, § 2, effective August 4.

L. 2004:

(4) amended, p. 132, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(4) amended, p. 2020, § 13, effective June 1.

L. 2008:

(4) amended, p. 179, § 1, effective August 5.

11-30-118. Dividends.

At such intervals and for such periods of time as the board of directors may authorize and after provision for the required reserves, the board of directors may declare a dividend. Dividends may be paid at various rates on different classes of shares, and dividend credit may be accrued on different classes of shares, as determined by the board of directors. Dividends shall not be paid in excess of available earnings.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 303, § 18.

CSA:

C. 47, § 18.

L. 41:

p. 377, § 18.

L. 45:

p. 309, § 3.

L. 51:

p. 315, § 6.

CRS 53:

§ 38-1-18.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 38-1-18.

L. 67:

p. 321, § 15.

L. 75:

Entire section amended, p. 395, § 3, effective June 16.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 613, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 485, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 84:

Entire section amended, p. 375, § 9, effective July 1.

11-30-118.5. Preauthorized transfers - credit union must have written authorization. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 88:

Entire section added, p. 345, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 89:

Entire section repealed, p. 592, § 1, effective April 7.

11-30-119. Expulsion or withdrawal of members.

Any member may withdraw from the credit union at any time, but notice of withdrawal may be required in the bylaws. The board of directors may expel any member from membership in the credit union if such member fails to comply with the written rules and policies of the credit union as adopted and made available to the membership.

A member shall not be expelled until the member has been informed in writing of the reasons for the expulsion and has had reasonable opportunity to be heard.

All amounts paid on shares or as deposits of an expelled member or withdrawing member, together with any dividends or interest accredited thereto, to the date thereof, as funds become available and after deducting all amounts due from the member to the credit union, shall be paid to such member. The credit union may require sixty days' written notice of intention to withdraw shares and thirty days' written notice of intention to withdraw deposits. Withdrawing or expelled members shall have no further rights in the credit union but shall not, by such expulsion or withdrawal, be released from any remaining liability to the credit union.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 133, § 9, effective July 1, 2004.)

Source:

L. 31:

p. 304, § 19.

CSA:

C. 47, § 19.

L. 41:

p. 377, § 19.

CRS 53:

§ 38-1-19.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 38-1-19.

L. 67:

p. 322, § 16.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 613, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

Entire section amended, p. 200, § 1, effective September 1.

L. 2004:

(3) and (4) amended, p. 133, § 9, effective July 1.

11-30-120. Suspension - liquidation - procedures.

If it appears that any credit union is insolvent, or that it has willfully violated any provision of this article, or that it is operating in an unsafe or unsound manner, the commissioner may issue his order for such credit union to show cause why its operations should not be suspended until such insolvency, violation, or manner of operation is rectified and afford the credit union an opportunity for a hearing not less than ten days nor more than twenty days after such order. Such order shall be in writing and delivered by registered or certified mail. If the credit union fails to answer such order or if any officer or director of or attorney for the credit union fails to appear at the time set for the hearing, the commissioner either may revoke the certificate of incorporation of the credit union or may order the immediate suspension of operations of the credit union, except the collection of payments on outstanding loans or other obligations due the credit union, or both, and may enforce any such order by an action, filed in the district court of the judicial district wherein the principal office of the credit union is located, seeking to enjoin further operations or to appoint a receiver for such credit union.

Any credit union to which an order to show cause has been issued pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) may include with any answer or may present at any hearing resulting from such order its proposed plan to continue operations and rectify the insolvency, violation, or manner of operation specified in said order; or the credit union may request that it be dissolved and liquidated and a liquidating agent be appointed by the commissioner. Any credit union may request a stay of execution of any order of the commissioner revoking its certificate of incorporation or suspending its operations by filing an action in the district court for the judicial district in which the principal office of the credit union is located, within ten days after the issuance of such order.

If the commissioner revokes the charter of the credit union, he shall appoint a liquidating agent to liquidate the assets of the credit union pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.

If in the opinion of the board an emergency exists which may result in serious losses to the members, the board may revoke the charter of a credit union and immediately appoint a liquidating agent without notice or a hearing. Notice of the board's emergency determination shall be posted on the premises of the credit union that is the subject of the determination. Within ten days after an emergency determination by the board, the credit union or the directors of the credit union may file an application with the board to rescind such determination. The filing of an application to rescind a determination shall not act as a stay of the board's action pursuant to this subsection (1). The board shall grant the application if it finds that its action was unauthorized and upon granting an application shall rescind its action and restore the credit union to its board of directors. If no application is filed within ten days after the board's emergency determination, all action taken by the board shall be final.

(1.5) (a) The commissioner may appoint himself or herself or a third party as conservator of any credit union and immediately take possession and control of the business and assets of the credit union if the commissioner determines that:

Such action is necessary to conserve the assets of the credit union or to protect the interests of its members from acts or omissions of the existing management;

The credit union, by a resolution of its board of directors, consents to such action;

There is a willful violation of a cease-and-desist order that results in the credit union being operated in an unsafe or unsound manner; or

The credit union is significantly undercapitalized and has no reasonable prospect of becoming adequately capitalized.

The commissioner may appoint a conservator and take immediate possession of the credit union without prior notice or a hearing; except that, within ten days after the conservator is appointed, the credit union may file an appeal with the board requesting the board to rescind the commissioner's appointment of a conservator. Upon receipt of a timely appeal, the board shall set a date for a hearing and determine whether the commissioner's appointment should be rescinded; except that such appeal shall not act as a stay of the commissioner's action. If the board finds the commissioner's action was unauthorized, the board shall restore control of the credit union to its board of directors. If no appeal is filed within ten days after the commissioner's appointment of a conservator, any action taken by the commissioner shall be final.

In extraordinary circumstances, upon order of the board, any hearing conducted pursuant to this subsection (1.5) shall be exempt from any provision of law requiring that proceedings of the board be conducted publicly. Such extraordinary circumstances occur when specific concern arises about prompt withdrawal of moneys from the credit union.

The conservator shall have all the powers of the members, directors, officers, and committees of the credit union and shall be authorized to operate the credit union in its own name or to conserve its assets as directed by the commissioner. The conservator shall conduct the business of the credit union and make regular reports to the commissioner until such time as the commissioner has determined that the purposes of conservatorship have been accomplished and the credit union should be returned to the control of its board of directors. All costs incident to the conservatorship shall be paid out of the assets of the credit union. If the commissioner determines that the purposes of the conservatorship will not be accomplished, the commissioner may proceed with the involuntary liquidation of the credit union in the manner described in subsection (1) of this section.

If a conservator is appointed, and is other than the national credit union administration, another approved insurer, or an employee of the division of financial services, the conservator and any assistants shall provide a bond, payable to the credit union and executed by a surety company authorized to do business in this state, which meets with the approval of the financial services board, for the faithful discharge of their duties in connection with such conservatorship and the accounting for all moneys coming into their hands. The cost of such bond shall be paid from the assets of the credit union. Suit may be maintained on such bond by any person injured by a breach of the conditions thereof. This requirement may be deemed met if the financial services board determines that the credit union's fidelity bond covers the conservator and any assistants.

Any credit union may be voluntarily dissolved and liquidated upon majority vote of the entire membership thereof at a meeting especially called for the purpose or at the annual meeting where notice of such proposed action is mailed to the members at least thirty days prior to such meeting. In either event, a copy of the notice shall be delivered to the commissioner not less than ten days prior to such meeting. Any member of a credit union may cast his ballot for or against such dissolution and liquidation by mail within twenty days after such meeting. If a majority of the members of the credit union vote in favor of dissolution and liquidation, the board of directors, within five days after the close of voting, shall notify the commissioner of such action and specify the names and addresses of the directors and officers of the credit union who will conduct the dissolution and liquidation of the credit union. Upon such favorable vote, the credit union shall cease to do business except for the collection of payments on outstanding loans or other obligations due the credit union.

Under any procedure to dissolve and liquidate a credit union pursuant to subsection (1) or (2) of this section, the credit union shall continue in existence for the purpose of discharging its debts, collecting and distributing its assets, and doing all acts required in order to wind up its business, and it may sue and be sued for the enforcement of its debts and operations until its affairs are fully adjusted in liquidation. The assets of the credit union shall be used to pay: First, the expenses incidental to liquidation; second, liabilities due nonmembers; and third, deposits and savings club accounts. Any remaining assets shall be distributed to the members proportionately to the shares held by each member as of the date of dissolution.

Upon the liquidation and distribution of all assets of the credit union which may be reasonably expected to be collectible, the board of directors or the liquidating agent, as the case may be, shall execute in duplicate a certificate of dissolution, prescribed by the commissioner, upon which date the credit union shall cease to exist, and file the same with the secretary of state.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 304, § 20.

CSA:

C. 47, § 20.

L. 41:

p. 377, § 20.

L. 51:

p. 316, §§ 7, 8.

CRS 53:

§ 38-1-20.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 38-1-20.

L. 67:

p. 322, § 17.

L. 94:

(1)(d) added, p. 65, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(4) amended, p. 185, § 4, effective April 8.

L. 99:

(1.5) added, p. 1010, § 3, effective August 4.

11-30-120.5. Conversion - state to federal credit union - federal to state credit union.

A credit union organized under the provisions of this article may be converted into a federal credit union by complying with the requirements of this section.

The proposition for such conversion shall first be approved by a majority of the directors of the credit union. If so approved, the proposition shall be submitted to a meeting of its members. The notice of such meeting shall be in writing and may be delivered in person to each member or mailed to each member at the address for such member appearing on the records of the credit union. Such delivery or mailing shall be not more than thirty days nor less than seven days prior to the time of the meeting. Approval of the proposition for conversion shall be by the affirmative vote of not less than two-thirds of the members present and voting at the meeting.

A copy of the minutes of such meeting, verified by the affidavits of the president or vice-president and the secretary of the meeting, shall be filed with the administrator within ten days after the meeting.

Within ninety days after such meeting, the credit union shall take such action as may be necessary under the federal credit union act to convert into a federal credit union, and, within ten days after receipt of the federal credit union charter, there shall be filed with the commissioner a copy of the charter thus issued. Upon such filing the credit union shall cease to be a state credit union.

Upon ceasing to be a state credit union, such credit union shall no longer be subject to any of the provisions of the state law under which said credit union was organized; except that the successor federal credit union, being vested with all of the assets, shall continue to be responsible for all of the obligations of the state credit union to the same extent as though the conversion had not taken place.

A credit union organized under the laws of the United States may be converted into a credit union organized under the laws of this state by complying with all requirements to cease being a federal credit union and doing all acts and obtaining all authorization necessary to organize as a credit union under the provisions of this article.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire section added, p. 396, § 2, effective June 16.

L. 84:

(5) added, p. 375, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 90:

(3) amended, p. 1838, § 11, effective May 31.

11-30-121. Change in place of business.

A credit union may change its place of business to a location outside of the county or city and county in which previously located upon receiving written permission therefor from the commissioner. A credit union may change its place of business within the county or city and county in which previously located by providing written notice of the new address and the effective date of such change to the commissioner.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 305, § 21.

CSA:

C. 47, § 21.

L. 41:

p. 378, § 21.

L. 51:

p. 316, § 9.

CRS 53:

§ 38-1-21.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 38-1-21.

L. 67:

p. 323, § 18.

11-30-122. Merger.

The method of merger of two or more credit unions shall be as follows:

The board of directors of the continuing and each merging credit union shall:

Approve a plan for the proposed merger; and

Authorize representatives of each credit union to act on each credit union's behalf to bring about the merger.

The plan shall include such information as the board deems appropriate.

Upon approval of the merger plan by each board of directors for each credit union involved in the transaction, the merger plan, together with the resolutions of each board of directors, shall be submitted to the board. If the board determines that the merger plan complies with the provisions of this article and any applicable rules thereto, the board may approve the merger plan, subject to such other specific requirements as may be prescribed to fulfill the intended purposes of the proposed merger.

A meeting of the members of each merging credit union involved shall be called for the purpose of considering a merger. Notice of the meeting, including purpose, date, time, place, and ballot of the merger plan shall be given to the entire membership. At such meeting, at least two-thirds of the members present and voting must approve the proposed merger. If any member approves or disapproves the merger by returning a ballot, signed by such member, to the secretary of the credit union at or before the meeting, such ballot for all purposes of this section shall be deemed equivalent to the vote of such member at such meeting, notwithstanding the member is not then present.

The merger shall thereupon be consummated in the following manner:

The duly authorized representatives of each credit union shall execute, in duplicate, a certificate of merger stating:

That the board of directors of each credit union has approved the merger;

That more than two-thirds of the members of each merging credit union have approved the terms and conditions of the proposed merger at a meeting of the members called for that purpose; and

The name and location of the continuing credit union.

The continuing credit union shall prepare and adopt any bylaw amendments required by the board, consistent with the provisions of this article, and execute the same in duplicate.

The certificate above provided for and any required bylaw amendments, both executed in duplicate, shall be forwarded to the board.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 133, § 10, effective July 1, 2004.)

If the board approves the certificate and bylaw amendments, it shall so notify the representatives and shall issue a certificate of approval, attach it to the duplicate certificate of merger, and return the same to the representatives of the participating credit unions together with the duplicate of the bylaw amendments.

The duplicate of the certificate of merger with the board's certificate of approval attached shall be filed with the secretary of state who shall make a record of said certificate and return it, with his certificate of record attached, to the board for permanent record. The fee for said filing shall be determined and collected pursuant to section 24-21-104 (3), C.R.S.

Thereupon the participating credit unions shall be merged in accordance with the provisions of this section. The continuing credit union shall take over the assets and assume all the liabilities of each merging credit union.

A state chartered credit union may merge with a federal credit union provided all requirements outlined in this article and the appropriate federal credit union regulations have been complied with and approval of such proposed merger has been authorized by the board of directors of each credit union involved.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 305, § 21.

CSA:

C. 47, § 21.

L. 41:

p. 378, § 21.

L. 51:

p. 316, § 9.

CRS 53:

§ 38-1-22.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 38-1-22.

L. 75:

(1) amended and (7) added, p. 397, § 3, effective June 16.

L. 83:

(5) amended, p. 876, § 40, effective July 1.

L. 84:

(2)(a) amended, p. 376, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 90:

(2)(c) and (3) to (5) amended, p. 1838, § 12, effective May 31.

L. 93:

(2)(c) and (3) to (5) amended, p. 1446, § 8, effective June 6.

L. 2004:

(1) to (4) and (6) amended, p. 133, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(2)(a) amended, p. 763, § 16, effective June 1.

11-30-123. Taxation.

A credit union shall be deemed an institution for savings and, together with all accumulations therein, shall not be subject to taxation except as to real estate owned. The shares of a credit union shall not be subject to a stock transfer tax when issued by the corporation or when transferred from one member to another.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 305, § 22.

CSA:

C. 47, § 22.

L. 41:

p. 378, § 22.

CRS 53:

§ 38-1-23.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 38-1-23.

11-30-124. Transfer of functions - conforming of statutes.

As of April 11, 1988, the powers, duties, and functions of the state bank commissioner under this article are transferred to the state commissioner of financial services.

On April 11, 1988, all employees of the division of banking whose principal duties are concerned with the powers, duties, and functions transferred to the state commissioner of financial services and whose employment in the division of financial services is deemed necessary by the executive director of the department of regulatory agencies to carry out the purposes of this article are transferred to the division of financial services and shall become employees thereof. Such employees shall retain all rights to state personnel system and retirement benefits under the laws of this state, and their services shall be deemed to have been continuous.

On April 11, 1988, all items of property, real and personal, including office furniture and fixtures, books, documents, and records of the division of banking pertaining to the powers, duties, and functions transferred to the state commissioner of financial services pursuant to this section shall be transferred to the division of financial services and shall become the property thereof.

Whenever the state bank commissioner or the division of banking is referred to or designated by any contract or other document in connection with the powers, duties, and functions transferred to the state commissioner of financial services, such reference or designation shall be deemed to apply to the state commissioner of financial services or the division of financial services, as the case may be. All contracts entered into by the state bank commissioner or the division of banking prior to April 11, 1988, in connection with the powers, duties, and functions transferred to the state commissioner of financial services are hereby validated, with the state commissioner of financial services succeeding to all the rights and obligations of such contracts.

On April 11, 1988, any unexpended appropriations of funds for the current fiscal year made to the division of banking and allocated for the administration and enforcement of this article shall be transferred to the division of financial services. The executive director of the department of regulatory agencies shall have the final authority to determine the allocation of funds for purposes of the transfer under this subsection (5).

The revisor of statutes is authorized to change all references to the state bank commissioner in this article to refer to the state commissioner of financial services and to change all references to the division of banking in this article to refer to the division of financial services.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire section added, p. 416, § 6, effective April 11.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 618, § 9, effective July 1.